Idaho statutes. Title 44 LABOR
Chapter 23
CONSTRUCTION STANDARDS FOR ENERGY CONSERVATION

Sec.

§ 44-2301 — 44-2305. Definitions — Adoption of energy-efficient construction standards — Administration, enforcement, certification, inspections and fees — Release from liability — Review. [Repealed.]

§ 44-2306. Idaho public utilities commission report. [Repealed.]